Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 1
PUBLIC UTILITIES - FRANCHISES

Cross references:

For requirement that a municipality be made a party in any proceeding involving the validity of an ordinance or franchise and that the attorney general be served with a copy in any proceeding involving the constitutionality of an ordinance or franchise, see § 13-51-115 and C.R.C.P. 57(j).

31-32-101. Franchise granted by ordinance.

No franchise or license giving or granting to any person the right or privilege to erect, construct, operate, or maintain a street railway, electric light plant or system, gasworks, gas plant or system, geothermal system, solar system, or telegraph or telephone system within any city or town or to use the streets or alleys of a city or town for such purposes shall be granted or given by any city or town in this state in any other manner or form than by an ordinance passed and published in the manner set forth in this part 1.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1243, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-32-101 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-32-102. Notice of application - publication.

Any person desiring to secure a franchise or license for any of the purposes named in section 31-32-101 shall cause a notice of its intention to apply to the governing body of the city or town for the passage of an ordinance granting such franchise or license. Notice shall be published, in a newspaper of general circulation published in such city or town, once a week for three successive weeks immediately prior to the next regular meeting of the governing body at which it is intended to apply for the passage of the ordinance granting or giving such franchise or license. Such notice shall specify the regular meeting of the governing body at which it is intended to apply for such franchise or license, the name of the applicant therefor, a general description of the rights and privileges to be applied for, and the time for and terms upon which such franchise or license is desired. If there is no newspaper of general circulation published within the city or town, such notice may be published by posting copies thereof in six public places for the same length of time.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1243, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-32-102 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-32-103. Ordinance read twice - publication before passage.

Every such ordinance shall be read at least twice in full, once at the time of its introduction and again before the question of its passage is voted upon. No governing body of any city or town shall permit any such ordinance to be introduced or read for the first time at any meeting other than the regular meeting specified in such notice nor unless proof of compliance by the applicant with section 31-32-102 is first presented to such governing body in the form of a publisher's affidavit of publication or a certificate of the clerk of the posting of such notice. When such ordinance has been introduced and read for the first time, the governing body, if it desires to further consider the granting of the rights or privileges sought for thereby, shall order the same to be published daily in a paper of general circulation published in such city or town for a period of not less than two weeks prior to the time such ordinance is again read and put upon its passage. If there is no paper of general circulation published daily in such city or town, such publication shall be made in a paper of general circulation published weekly in such city or town. If there is no such paper published daily or weekly, such publication shall be made by posting copies of such proposed ordinance in at least six public places in such municipality for the same period of time. No such ordinance shall be adopted or passed by the governing body of any city or town unless the same has been previously introduced and read and publication first made as provided for in this section. Such previous introduction and reading of such ordinance and the fact of its publication in a newspaper or by posting shall appear in the certificate and the attestation of the clerk on such ordinance after its adoption.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1243, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-32-103 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-32-104. Majority vote required for passage.

Every such ordinance shall require for its passage or adoption the concurrence of a majority of all the members of the governing body of the city or town.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1244, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1496, § 11, effective May 28.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-32-104 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-32-105. Cities or towns may erect utilities.

Nothing in this part 1 shall be construed as in any way modifying or restricting the right of cities or towns to purchase or erect electric light works, heating and cooling works and distribution systems for the distribution of heat and cooling obtained from geothermal resources, solar or wind energy, hydroelectric or renewable biomass resources, including waste and cogenerated heat, or gasworks in the manner provided for by law.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1244, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1457, § 5, effective May 27.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-32-105 as it existed prior to 1975.